en: Curaçao, Curacao
xx: Curaçao

en: Advocaat
az: Advokat
ca: Advocaat
de: Eierlikör
el: Αυγό
eo: Ovobrando
es: Advocaat
fi: Munalikööri
fr: Liqueur aux œufs, Liqueur aux oeufs
he: אדבוקט
hr: Zagovornik
hu: Tojáslikőr, Advocaat
ia: Advocaat
id: Advocaat
it: Advocaat
ja: アドヴォカート
ko: 아드보카트
li: Advokäötje
lt: Advocaat
nl: Advocaat, eierlikeur
nn: Advocaat
pl: Advocaat
pt: Advocaat
ru: Адвокат
sv: Advocaat
uk: Адвокат
yi: אייער ליקער
zh: 蛋黄酒

en: Soft drinks
af: Koeldrank
an: Refresco
ar: مشروب غازي
ba: Йомшаҡ эсемлек
be: Асвяжальны напой
bn: কোমল পানীয়
ca: Refrescs
cy: Diod feddal
da: Læskedrikke
de: Erfrischungsgetränke, Softdrink, Erfrischungsgetränk
eo: Refreŝigaĵoj
es: Refrescos
et: Karastusjook
fa: نوشابه
fi: Virvoitusjuomat
fr: Boissons rafraîchissantes
ga: Droch bhog
hi: शीतल पेय
hu: Üdítőitalok, Üdítőital
hy: Ոչ ոգելից ըմպելիքներ
id: Minuman ringan
ik: Imiġaaq
is: Gosdrykkur
it: Bibita
iu: ᐃᒥᒐᖅ
ja: ソフトドリンク
jv: Ombènan alus
ko: 청량 음료
ku: Saremenî
la: Potio refrigeratoria
lb: Erfrëschungsgedrénks
lt: Gaivusis gėrimas
lv: Atspirdzinošs dzēriens
mn: Зөөлөн ундаа
ms: Minuman ringan
my: အချိုရည်
pt: Bebidas refrescantes, Refrigerante
ro: Băutură răcoritoare
ru: Освежающий напиток
sa: सिद्धपेयम्
so: Cabitaan fudud
sq: Pija freskuese
sv: Läskedrycker, Läsk, Läskedryck
ta: குளிர்பானம்
te: కోలా పానీయాలు
tl: Sopdrink
tr: Meşrubat
ur: سوفٹ ڈرنک
uz: Spirtsiz ichimliklar
zh: 軟性飲料

en: Still fruit soft drinks, Still fruit soft drink
fr: Boissons plates aux fruits, Boisson plate aux fruits, Boisson aux fruits plate
hu: Szénsavmentes gyümölcsös üdítőitalok

en: Still fruit soft drink with less than 10% of fruit juice without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson plate aux fruits non sucrée avec édulcorants et moins de 10% de jus

en: Still fruit soft drink with sugar
fr: Boissons plates aux fruits sucrées, Boisson plate aux fruits sucrée
hu: Szénsavmentes gyümölcsös cukros üdítőitalok

en: Still fruit soft drink with sugar and with less than 10% of fruit juice
fr: Boissons plates aux fruits sucrée avec moins de 10% de jus

en: Still fruit soft drink with reduced sugar and with 10-50% of fruit juice
fr: Boissons plates aux fruits avec 10 à 50% de jus à teneur réduite en sucres

en: Still fruit soft drink with sugar and with 10-50% of fruit juice
fr: Boissons plates aux fruits sucrées avec 10 à 50% de jus

en: Still soft drinks
de: Stillgetränke
es: Bebida gaseosa sin gas
hr: Bezalkoholno piće
hu: Szénsavmentes üdítőitalok, Szénsavmentes üdítők
nl: Koolzuurvrije frisdranken

en: Carbonated drinks
bg: Газирани напитки
ca: Begudes carbonatades
cs: Sycené nápoje
da: Kulsyreholdige drikkevarer
de: Kohlensäurehaltige Getränke
es: Bebidas carbonatadas
fi: hiilihapotetut juomat
fr: Boissons gazeuses, boissons à bulles, boissons effervescentes, boissons pétillantes, boisson gazeuse, boisson à bulles, boisson effervescente, boisson pétillante
hr: gazirana pića, gazirano piće
hu: Szénsavas italok
it: Bevande effervescente, bevande gassate, bevande frizzanti
ja: 炭酸飲料
lt: Gazuoti gėrimai, gazuotas gėrimas
nl: Koolzuurhoudende dranken
pl: Napoje gazowane
pt: Bebidas carbonatadas
ru: Газированные напитки
sl: gazirane pijače, gazirana pijača
sv: Kolsyrade Drycker
tr: Gazlı içecekler
zh: 碳酸饮料

en: Sodas, carbonated soft drinks
bg: Сода
bo: རླངས་ཆུ།
ca: Refrescs carbonatats
da: Sodavand
el: Ανθρακούχο ποτό
es: Sodas, Gaseosas
eu: Gaseosa
fr: Sodas, soda, boissons sucrées gazeuses, boissons gazeuses sucrées
gl: Gasosa
he: משקאות מוגזים, משקאות קלים
hr: Zaslađena gazirana pića
hu: Szénsavas üdítőitalok
it: Bibite gassate, soft drink
lt: Gazuoti gaivieji gėrimai
mi: Inu mirumiru
mk: Газиран пијалак
nb: Brus
nl: Frisdranken, Frisdrank
nn: Brus
oc: Gasosa
pt: Sodas, Bebidas refrescantes com gazozo
ro: Băuturi carbogazoase, Bauturi carbogazoase, bauturi racoritoare carbogazoase, băuturi răcoritoare carbogazoase
ru: Газированные безалкагольные напитки
se: Bruvsa
sh: Gazirano piće
sr: Газирано пиће
sv: Sodavatten, Soda
th: น้ำอัดลม
uk: Газований напій
vi: Nước ngọt có ga
zh: 汽水, 软性饮料, 苏打饮料

en: Carbonated soft drinks without fruit juice
bg: Газирани без плодови сокове
ca: Begudes carbonatades sense suc de fruita
cs: Sycené nápoje bez ovocné šťávy
da: Kulsyreholdige drikkevarer uden frugtsaft
de: Kohlensäurehaltige Getränke ohne Fruchtsaft
es: Bebidas carbonatadas sin jugo de frutas
fi: Hiilihapotetut virvoitusjuomat ilman hedelmämehua
fr: Boissons gazeuses sans jus de fruit
hr: Gazirana pića bez voćnog soka
hu: Gyümölcsmentes szénsavas üdítőitalok, Gyümölcs nélküli szénsavas üdítőitalok
it: Bibite gassate senza succo di frutta
ja: 果汁なしの炭酸飲料
lt: Gazuoti gaivieji gėrimai be vaisių sulčių
nl: Koolzuurhoudende dranken zonder vruchtensap
pl: Napoje gazowane bez soku owocowego
pt: Bebidas carbonatadas sem suco de frutas
ru: Газированные напитки без фруктового сока
sl: Gazirane pijače brez sadnega soka
sv: Kolsyrade drycker utan fruktjuice
tr: Meyve suyu olmayan gazlı içecekler
zh: 无果汁的碳酸饮料

en: Carbonated soft drinks without fruit juice with sugar
da: Sukkerholdige kulsyreholdige drikkevarer uden frugtsaft
de: Zuckerhaltige kohlensäurehaltige Getränke ohne Fruchtsaft
es: Bebidas carbonatadas azucaradas sin jugo de frutas
fi: Sokerilla makeutetut hiilihapotetut juomat ilman hedelmämehua
fr: Boissons gazeuses sucrées sans jus de fruit
hr: Gazirana pića s šećerom bez voćnog soka
hu: Cukros gyümölcsmentes szénsavas üdítőitalok, Cukros szénsavas üdítőitalok gyümölcs nélkül
it: Bibite gassate zuccherate senza succo di frutta
ja: 果汁なしの炭酸飲料（砂糖入り）
lt: Gazuoti gaivieji gėrimai su cukrumi be vaisių sulčių
nl: Koolzuurhoudende dranken met suiker zonder vruchtensap
pl: Napoje gazowane z cukrem bez soku owocowego
pt: Bebidas carbonatadas com açúcar sem suco de frutas
ru: Газированные напитки с сахаром без фруктового сока
sl: Gazirane pijače s sladkorjem brez sadnega soka
sv: Sockerhaltiga kolsyrade drycker utan fruktjuice
tr: Şekerli meyve suyu olmayan gazlı içecekler
zh: 含糖无果汁的碳酸饮料

en: Carbonated soft drinks without fruit juice with reduced sugar
fr: Boissons gazeuses sans jus de fruit à teneur réduite en sucres

en: Carbonated soft drinks without fruit juice with sugar and artificial sweeteners
fr: Boissons gazeuses sans jus de fruit sucrées avec édulcorants

en: Carbonated soft drink without fruit juice without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson gazeuse sans jus de fruit non sucrée avec édulcorants

en: Carbonated fruit soft drink
bg: Газирано плодово безалкохолно питие
ca: Beguda gasosa de fruita
cs: Ovocný perlivý nápoj
da: Kulsyreholdig frugtdrik
de: Fruchtlimonade mit Kohlensäure
es: Bebida gaseosa de frutas
fi: Hiilihapotettu hedelmäjuoma
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits
hr: Gazirano voćno bezalkoholno piće
hu: Gyümölcsös szénsavas üdítőital, Szénsavas gyümölcsös üdítőital
it: Bibita gassata ai frutti
ja: 果実入り炭酸飲料
lt: Gazuotas vaisių gaivusis gėrimas
nl: Koolzuurhoudend fruitdrankje
pl: Gazowany napój owocowy
pt: Bebida gaseificada de frutas
ru: Газированный фруктовый безалкогольный напиток
sl: Gazirana sadna brezalkoholna pijača
sv: Kolsyrad fruktig läskedryck
tr: Gazlı meyve gazsız içecek
zh: 果汁碳酸饮料

en: Carbonated fruit soft drink with sugar
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits sucrée
hu: Cukros gyümölcsös szénsavas üdítőital

en: Carbonated fruit soft drinks with sugar with 10-50% of fruit juice
fr: Boissons gazeuses non sucrées aux fruits avec 10 à 50% de jus